Utah statutes.
78A-7-205.   Required annual training -- Expenses -- Failure to attend.

(1)  Prior to assuming office all justice court judges shall attend an orientation seminar conducted under the direction of the Judicial Council.

(2)  All justice court judges shall attend the continuing education conducted under the supervision of the Judicial Council each calendar year.

(a)  Successful completion of the continuing education requirement includes instruction regarding competency and understanding of constitutional provisions and laws relating to the jurisdiction of the court, rules of evidence, and rules of civil and criminal procedure as indicated by a certificate awarded by the Judicial Council.

(b)  The county or municipality creating and maintaining a justice court shall assume the expenses of travel, meals, and lodging for the judge to attend education and training seminars conducted by the Judicial Council.

(3)  Any judge not obtaining a certificate for two consecutive years may be removed from office for cause under this section.

(4)  The Judicial Council shall inform the Judicial Conduct Commission of the names of justice court judges failing to comply with this section.

